District of Columbia statutes.
22-2402

Perjury.

(a)

A person commits the offense of perjury if:

(1)

Having taken an oath or affirmation before a competent tribunal, officer, or person, in a case in which the law authorized such oath or affirmation to be administered, that he or she will testify, declare, depose, or certify truly, or that any written testimony, declaration, deposition, or certificate by that person subscribed is true, wilfully and contrary to an oath or affirmation states or subscribes any material matter which he or she does not believe to be true and which in fact is not true;

(2)

As a notary public or other officer authorized to take proof of certification, wilfully certifies falsely that an instrument was acknowledged by any party thereto or wilfully certifies falsely as to another material matter in an acknowledgement; or

(3)

In any declaration, certificate, verification, or statement made under penalty of perjury in the form specified in § 16-5306 or 28 U.S.C. § 1746(2), the person willfully states or subscribes as true any material matter that the person does not believe to be true and that in fact is not true.

(b)

Any person convicted of perjury shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned for not more than 10 years, or both.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 401, 29 DCR 3976
July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-191, § 3, 57 DCR 3400
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 205(x), 60 DCR 2064
Alcoholic beverage license, false statement in application, see § 25-401.
Allowance authorized for decedent’s family, false affidavit concerning, see § 19-101.
Closing-out sale license, false statement in application for, see § 47-2102.
District of Columbia Civilian Complaint Review Board, willful false swearing before, see § 5-1135.
Firearms control law, use of information as evidence in criminal proceedings, see §§ 7-2502.11 and 7-2504.09.
Homestead deduction application, false statements in, see § 47-850.
Hospitalization of mentally ill, offenses and penalties, see § 21-591.
Interrogatories to garnishee, willful false statement, see § 16-552.
Life insurance companies or agents, false statement by, see § 31-4308.
Medicaid provider fraud prosecutions, false swearing, see § 4-804.
Metropolitan Police or Fire Department trial boards, willful false swearing before, see § 5-1002.
Nonprofit housing development water and sewer rate deductions, false statements concerning eligibility, see §§ 34-2413.05 and 34-2105.04.
This section is referenced in § 2-1831.13, § 4-804, § 7-2502.05, § 7-2502.11, and § 7-2504.09.
1981 Ed., § 22-2511.
D.C. Law 18-191, in subsec. (a), deleted “or” from the end of par. (1); substituted “; or” for a period at the end of par. (2), and added par. (3).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $5,000” in (b).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 205(x) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.